District of Columbia statutes.
8-1821.01

Commercial animal breeder license.

(a)

Within 180 days of December 5, 2008, the Mayor shall establish licensure requirements for commercial animal breeders in the District of Columbia, which shall include:

(1)

Licensing fees;

(2)

Standards for the care and management of animals; and

(3)

Facility inspection requirements.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “commercial animal breeder” means any person, firm, organization, or corporation engaged in the operation of breeding and raising more than 25 animals per year for sale or in return for consideration.

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 201, 55 DCR 9186
Section 701 of D.C. Law 17-281 provided: “Sec. 701. Rulemaking. The Mayor, pursuant to Title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this act.”